Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.220

Incarceration in correctional institution or facility prohibited—Exceptions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

No person who is criminally insane confined pursuant to this chapter shall be incarcerated in a state correctional institution or facility. This section does not apply to confinement in a mental health facility located wholly within a correctional institution. Confinement of a person who is criminally insane in a county jail or other local facility while awaiting either placement in a treatment program or a court hearing pursuant to this chapter is permitted for no more than seven days.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 8; 1982 c 112 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 17; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 22.]

NOTES:

Finding—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.

Effective dates—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.